Massachusetts, session 194th, H1761.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Charlestown District courthouse in the city of Charlestown shall be designated and
known as the George Lewis Ruffin Courthouse in honor of the honorable George Lewis Ruffin,
the first African American to graduate from Harvard Law School, first African American to
serve on the Boston City Council, elected to the Massachusetts Legislature in 1870, and the first
African American Judge in the United States that was appointed in 1883 and served in the
Charlestown District Court, for his many contributions to the judiciary, the bar and the people of
the city of Boston. The division of capital asset management and maintenance shall erect and
maintain suitable markers bearing the designation in compliance with the standards of the
division
of 1